District of Columbia statutes.
21-581

Proceedings instituted by Mayor of the District of Columbia.

Proceedings instituted by the Mayor of the District of Columbia to determine the mental condition of an alleged indigent mentally ill person or a person alleged to be mentally ill, with homicidal or otherwise dangerous tendencies, shall be according to the provisions of subchapter IV of this chapter.

History

Sept. 14, 1965, 79 Stat. 759, Pub. L. 89-183, § 1
July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 567, Pub. L. 91-358, title I, § 150(c)(5)(A)
Mar. 24, 1998, D.C. Law 12-81, § 14(k), 45 DCR 745

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 21-581.
1973 Ed., § 21-581.